Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
RESIDENTIAL AND LONG TERM CARE
SECTION 1.
 ORS 441.736 is amended to read:
441.736. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Immediate jeopardy” means a situation in which the failure of a  residential care facility or
a long  term care facility to comply with a rule of the Department of Human Services has caused
or is likely to cause serious injury, serious harm, serious impairment or death to a resident.
(b) “License condition” includes but is not limited to:
(A) Restricting the total number of residents;
(B) Restricting the number and impairment level of residents based upon the  capacity of the
licensee and staff to meet the health and safety needs of all residents;
(C) Requiring additional staff or staff qualifications;
(D) Requiring additional training for staff;
(E) Requiring additional documentation; or
(F) Restriction of admissions.
(c) “Preliminary finding” means an  objective finding based on the available evidence at
the time that the department conducts an initial investigation of a complaint.
[(c)] (d) “Substantial compliance” means a level of compliance with state  law and with rules of
the department such that any identified deficiencies pose a risk of no more than negligible harm  to
the health or safety of residents of a residential care facility or a long term care facility.
[(2)(a) The department may impose a condition on  the license of a residential care facility or long
term care facility  in response to a substantiated finding of rule violation, including but not limited to
a substantiated finding of abuse, and shall impose a condition on the  license in response to a finding
of immediate jeopardy, whether or  not the finding of immediate jeopardy is substantiated at the time
the license condition is imposed. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 1
(2) The department may  impose a condition on the license of a residential care facility
or long term care facility in response  to a substantiated finding of rule violation, including
but not limited to a substantiated finding of abuse.
(3) The department shall impose a condition on the license  of a residential care facility
or long term care facility in response to:
(a) A preliminary finding of immediate jeopardy that is reasonably  likely to result in a
substantiated finding; or
(b) A substantiated finding of immediate jeopardy.
(4)(a) Before the department may make a preliminary finding  of immediate jeopardy, the
department must, at a minimum, provide an opportunity  for the facility to provide initial
information or evidence to the department regarding the allegations in the complaint.
(b) If the department  imposes a license condition based on a preliminary finding of im-
mediate jeopardy and the preliminary finding is not substantiated within  30 days after the
imposition of the license  condition, the department shall immediately notify the facility and
remove the license condition.
[(b)] (5) The department shall impose a license condition in a scope and manner that is specif-
ically designed to remediate the finding that led to the license condition.
[(c) If the department imposes a license condition in  response to a finding of immediate jeopardy
to residents of the facility, and the finding of immediate jeopardy  to residents of the facility is not
substantiated within 30 days after the imposition of the  license condition, the department shall imme-
diately remove the license condition. ]
[(d)(A)] (6)(a) Except as  provided in [ subparagraph (B) of this paragraph ] paragraph (b) of this
subsection, the department shall provide a facility with a notice  of impending imposition of license
condition at least 48 hours before issuing an order imposing a license condition. The notice must:
[(i)] (A) Describe the acts or omissions  of the facility and the circumstances that led to the
substantiated finding  of rule violation or finding of immediate jeopardy supporting the imposition
of the license condition;
[(ii)] (B) Describe why  the acts or omissions and the circumstances create a situation for which
the imposition of a license condition is warranted;
[(iii)] (C) Provide a brief statement identifying the nature of the license condition;
[(iv)] (D) Provide a  brief statement describing how the license condition is designed to remediate
the circumstances that led to the license condition; and
[(v)] (E) Provide a brief statement of the requirements for withdrawal of the license condition.
[(B)] (b) If the threat to residents of a facility is  so imminent that the department determines
it is not safe or practical to give the  facility advance notice, the department must provide the notice
required under this [ paragraph] subsection within 48 hours of issuing an order imposing  the license
condition.
[(e)] (7) An order imposing a license condition must include:
[(A)] (a) A specific description of how the scope and manner of the license  condition is designed
to remediate the findings that led to the license condition; and
[(B)] (b) A specific description of the requirements for withdrawal of the license condition.
(8) For a license condition that is imposed in response to a preliminary finding or sub-
stantiated finding of immediate jeopardy, the order must also include  a summary of the ev-
idence demonstrating that:
(a) The facility has failed to meet one or  more health, safety or quality rules or regu-
lations;
(b) As a result  of the facility’s noncompliance described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section, serious injury, serious harm,  serious impairment or death has occurred or is likely
to occur if the noncompliance is not corrected;
(c) The facility has  not demonstrated that the noncompliance described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection has been corrected; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 2
(d) At the time the license  condition is imposed, there is a current need for immediate
corrective action by the facility to prevent serious injury, serious harm,  serious impairment
or death from occurring or recurring.
[(3)] (9) The department may impose a license condition that includes a restriction on admissions
to the facility only if the department makes a finding of immediate jeopardy that is likely to  present
an immediate jeopardy to future residents upon admission.
[(4)(a)] (10)(a) Following the imposition of a license  condition on a facility, the department shall:
(A) Within 15 business days of receipt of the facility’s written assertion  of substantial compli-
ance with the requirements set forth by the department for withdrawal of the license  condition, re-
inspect or reevaluate the facility to determine  whether the facility has achieved substantial
compliance with the requirements;
(B) Notify the facility by telephone or electronic means of the findings  of the reinspection or
reevaluation within five business days after completion of the reinspection or reevaluation; and
(C) Issue a written report to the facility within  30 days after the reinspection or reevaluation
notifying the facility of the department’s determinations regarding substantial compliance  with the
requirements necessary for withdrawal of the license condition.
(b) If the department finds that the facility has achieved  substantial compliance regarding the
violation for which the license  condition was imposed, and finds that systems are in place to ensure
similar deficiencies do not reoccur, the department shall withdraw the license condition.
(c) If after reinspection or reevaluation the department determines that  the violation for which
the license condition  was imposed continues to exist, the department may not withdraw the license
condition,  and  the department is not obligated to reinspect or reevaluate the facility again for 45
days after the first reinspection or reevaluation. The department  shall provide the decision not to
withdraw the license condition to  the facility in writing and inform the facility of the right to a
contested case hearing pursuant to ORS chapter 183. Nothing  in this paragraph limits the
department’s authority to visit or inspect the facility at any time.
(d) If the department does not meet the requirements  of this subsection, a license condition is
automatically removed on  the date the department failed to meet the requirements of this sub-
section, unless the Director of Human Services  extends the applicable period for no more than 15
business days. The director  may not delegate the power to make a determination regarding an ex-
tension under this paragraph.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this  section, “residential care facility” means a residential
care facility as defined in ORS 443.400, including an  assisted living facility and a facility with
a memory care endorsement under ORS 443.886.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall adopt by rule a model consent  form for the
use of a video camera or other  electronic monitoring device in a resident’s room at a resi-
dential care facility.
SECTION 3. (1) Notwithstanding ORS  443.415, 443.416, 443.436, 443.441, 443.443, 443.735,
443.755 and 443.886, the  Department of Human Services and the Oregon Health Authority
may take reasonable steps to achieve substantial compliance with the terms of ORS 443.415,
443.416, 443.436, 443.441, 443.443, 443.735, 443.755 and 443.886,  as those sections are amended
by sections 1, 7, 8, 10 to  13 and 15, chapter 619, Oregon Laws 2025, on or before January 1,
2027.
(2) The department and the authority shall comply fully with the  terms of ORS 443.415,
443.416, 443.436, 443.441, 443.443, 443.735, 443.755  and 443.886, as those sections are amended
by sections 1, 7, 8, 10 to 13 and 15,  chapter 619, Oregon Laws 2025, no later than January 1,
2027.
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES SERVICES
SECTION 4.
 ORS 427.005 is amended to read:
427.005. As used in this chapter , unless the context requires otherwise :
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 3
(1) “Adaptive behavior” means the effectiveness or degree  with which an individual meets the
standards of personal independence and social responsibility expected for age and cultural group.
(2) “Agency” means an entity that is  certified and endorsed by the Department of Human
Services to provide services to individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
[(2)] (3) “Care” means:
(a) Supportive services, including, but not limited to, provision of room and board;
(b) Supervision;
(c) Protection; and
(d) Assistance in bathing, dressing, grooming, eating, management of money, transportation  or
recreation.
[(3)] (4) “Community developmental disabilities program  director” means the director of a com-
munity developmental disabilities program described in ORS 430.620 (1)(a) or (c).
[(4)] (5) “Competitive  integrated employment” has the meaning given that term in 29 U.S.C. 705.
[(5)] (6) “Developmental disability” means autism, cerebral palsy, epilepsy or  other condition
diagnosed by a qualified professional that:
(a) Originates before an individual is 22 years of age and is expected to continue indefinitely;
(b) Results in a significant impairment in adaptive behavior as measured by a  qualified profes-
sional;
(c) Is not  attributed primarily to other conditions including, but not limited to, a mental or
emotional disorder, sensory impairment, substance abuse, personality disorder, learning disability
or attention deficit hyperactivity disorder; and
(d) Requires supports similar to those required by an individual with an intellectual disability.
[(6)] (7) “Director  of the facility” means the person in charge of care, treatment and training
programs at a facility.
(8) “Direct support professional” means an individual who is hired, employed, trained,
paid and supervised by an agency to provide care  or employment services, as defined in ORS
427.101, to a client of the agency.
[(7)] (9) “Facility” means a group  home, activity center, community mental health clinic or other
facility or program that the  Department of Human Services approves to provide necessary services
to persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities.
[(8)] (10) “Incapacitated” means a person is unable,  without assistance, to properly manage or
take care of personal affairs, including  but not limited to financial and medical decision-making, or
is incapable, without assistance, of self-care.
[(9)] (11) “Independence” means the extent to which persons with intellectual  or developmental
disabilities exert control and choice over their own lives.
[(10)] (12) “Integration” means:
(a) Use by persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities of  the same community re-
sources that are used by and available to other persons;
(b) Participation by persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities in the same commu-
nity activities in which persons without disabilities participate, together with regular  contact with
persons without disabilities; and
(c) Residence by persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities in homes or  in home-like
settings that are in proximity to community resources, together with regular  contact with persons
without disabilities in their community.
[(11)(a)] (13)(a) “Intellectual disability” means an intelligence quotient of 70 or below  as meas-
ured by a qualified professional and existing concurrently with significant impairment in  adaptive
behavior, that is manifested before the individual is 18 years of age.
(b) An  individual with intelligence quotients of 71 through 75 may be considered to have an in-
tellectual disability if there is also  significant impairment in adaptive behavior, as diagnosed and
measured by a qualified professional.
(c) The impairment in adaptive behavior must be directly related to the intellectual disability.
[(12)] (14) “Minor” means an unmarried person under 18 years of age.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 4
[(13)] (15) “Naturopathic physician” has the meaning given the term in ORS 685.010.
[(14)] (16) “Physician” means a person  licensed by the Oregon Medical Board to practice medi-
cine and surgery.
[(15)] (17) “Service coordination” means person-centered planning, case management,  procuring,
coordinating  and  monitoring of services under an individualized support plan to establish desired
outcomes, determine needs and identify resources for a person  with intellectual or developmental
disabilities and advocating for the person.
[(16)] (18) “Training” means:
(a) The systematic, planned maintenance, development or enhancement of self-care,  social or
independent living skills; or
(b) The planned sequence of systematic interactions,  activities, structured learning situations
or education designed to meet each person’s specified needs in the  areas of physical, emotional, in-
tellectual and social growth.
[(17)] (19) “Treatment” means the provision of specific physical, mental,  social interventions and
therapies that halt, control or reverse processes that cause, aggravate  or complicate malfunctions
or dysfunctions.
SECTION 5. ORS 427.024, 427.181 and 427.191 and section 10 of this 2026 Act are  added to
and made a part of ORS chapter 427.
SECTION 6.  ORS 427.024 is amended to read:
427.024. (1) The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules to ensure fiscal transparency
in the provision of  community-based services to individuals with intellectual or developmental disa-
bilities and to ensure individuals with intellectual or  developmental disabilities receive high quality
services from [ providers that are licensed, certified or endorsed by the department to  provide
community-based services ] agencies . At a minimum,  the rules must establish, for [ providers of
community-based services to individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities ] agencies:
(a) Requirements  to annually submit staffing data to a reporting survey organization specified
by the department;
(b) Requirements to submit an annual report to the department that includes:
(A) A disclosure of executive compensation and benefits;
(B) A disclosure  of starting, average and highest wages for direct support professionals that are
employed by, under contract with or otherwise engaged with the [ provider] agency to deliver
community-based services to individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities;
(C) A disclosure of the [ provider’s ] agency’s overhead expenses and expenditures; and
(D) Any other fiscal matters prescribed by the department;
(c) Requirements to ensure that wages and health benefits paid to  direct support professionals
delivering community-based supports reflect any increase in rates approved by the  Legislative As-
sembly for the purpose of improving wages and health benefits;
(d) Criteria for conditions under which [ a provider ] an agency may be prohibited from applying
for a license, certificate or endorsement;
(e) Criteria for the inclusion of information about the organizational history of an applicant  for
a new license, certification or endorsement, not to exceed the 10 previous years; and
(f) A process for the consideration  of the regulatory and safety compliance and operational ex-
perience of all [ providers] agencies in this state or  in any other jurisdiction when issuing an initial
license, certification or endorsement or renewing a license, certification or endorsement.
(2) Rules adopted by the department must, to the greatest extent practicable,  consolidate new
reporting requirements with existing reporting requirements  to avoid the need for [ providers]
agencies to make duplicative reports of the same information.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 427.026 is amended to read:
427.026. (1) As used in this section:
[(a) “Agency”  means an entity that is certified and endorsed by the Department of Human Services
to provide services to individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities. ]
[(b)] (a) “Ownership interest” means:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 5
(A) A direct or indirect ownership interest, or a  combination of direct and indirect ownership
interests, equal to five percent or more in an agency;
(B) An interest in any mortgage, deed of trust,  note or other obligation secured by an agency
if the interest equals at least five percent of the value of the property or assets of the agency;
(C) Holding the position of an officer or director of an agency that is organized as an entity;
(D) Holding the position of a partner of an agency that is organized as a partnership; or
(E) Holding the position of a member of  the board of directors of an agency that has a board
of directors.
[(c)] (b) “Provider” means:
(A) An agency;
(B) An adult foster home, as defined in ORS 443.705,  that is licensed to provide residential care
to individuals with intellectual or developmental disabilities; or
(C) A developmental disability child foster home, as defined in ORS 443.830.
[(d)] (c) “Responsible person” means:
(A) A person who exercises operational or managerial  control over, who has an ownership in-
terest in or who directly or indirectly conducts the day-to-day operations of an agency;
(B) An owner, operator or resident manager of an  adult foster home, as defined in ORS 443.705,
that is licensed to provide  residential care to individuals with intellectual or developmental disa-
bilities; or
(C) An owner, operator or resident  manager of a developmental disability child foster home, as
defined in ORS 443.830.
(2) The Department of Human Services may revoke the  license, certificate or endorsement of a
provider and deny any new application for  a license, certificate or endorsement submitted by the
provider:
(a) For at least 12 months if a responsible person denies  the department access to a facility or
an individual receiving services or directs an employee or substitute caregiver to deny the  depart-
ment access to a facility or an individual receiving services.
(b) For at least 12 months  if a responsible person alters, conceals, destroys or otherwise ma-
nipulates records or directs an employee or substitute caregiver to alter, conceal, destroy or other-
wise manipulate records.
(c) For  at least 36 months if a responsible person’s persistent, egregious acts, failures to act or
failures to adequately train  or supervise employees or substitute caregivers led to, or reasonably
would be expected to lead to, the death of or serious harm to an individual.
(3) If  the department finds that the operations of a provider put the health, safety, rights or
welfare of the individuals served by the provider at  risk, the department may revoke, suspend or
impose conditions on the license, certificate or endorsement of the provider.  A suspension or con-
dition imposed under this subsection may not be lifted until the department has confirmed that all
concerns have been remediated.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 427.181 is amended to read:
427.181. (1) As used in this section and ORS 410.855:
(a) “Agency with choice services” means support given to an individual in self-directing the
individual’s services or in managing staff who are providing in-home services and  supports to the
individual, using a person-centered approach to ensure that the  individual is at the center of the
decision-making process regarding what services are needed, including by providing:
(A) Training, coaching and other forms of support to the individual on:
(i) Self-direction; and
(ii) The roles and responsibilities of the individual and  the agency with choice services provider;
(B) Training,  coaching and other forms of support to the individual in the overall management
of staff providing direct support services to the individual, including in the  recruitment, hiring,
scheduling and training of staff, performance assessments of staff and dismissal of staff; and
(C) Other administrative and employment-related supports.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 6
(b) “Individual” means a child or adult with an intellectual  or developmental disability who re-
ceives in-home services and supports through the Department of Human Services.
(2) The department shall contract with one  or more endorsed organizations to deliver agency
with choice services as a community-based services option under ORS 427.007 (1)(d).
(3) The department shall adopt  by rule minimum qualifications for agencies to be endorsed by
the department to deliver agency with choice services.
(4) Minimum qualifications for agencies endorsed to deliver agency  with choice services include,
but are not limited to:
(a) The ability to provide  support for individuals in directing the individual’s direct support
[worker] professional and the day-to-day services of the direct support [ worker] professional;
(b) A commitment to work with a broad coalition of stakeholders  in an effort to understand the
changing needs of the workforce and of individuals’ needs, rights and preferences; and
(c) The ability to meet the state’s interest in preventing or mitigating disruptions to individuals’
in-home services and supports.
(5) The department may not endorse an agency to  provide agency with choice services if the
owner of the agency or an  executive officer of the agency has been convicted of Medicaid fraud in
any state within the 25-year period prior to the certification.
(6) For the purpose of monitoring and evaluating workforce capacity  and trends, an agency en-
dorsed to provide agency with choice  services must annually provide to the department in the
manner and at intervals specified by the department by rule:
(a) A list of direct support [ workers ] professionals for which the agency billed the department
for services provided through the agency with choice model;
(b) The zip codes where the direct support [ workers ] professionals provided services; and
(c) Verification  of the completion of training required for each direct support [ worker] profes-
sional.
SECTION 9.  ORS 427.191 is amended to read:
427.191. (1) As used in this section:
[(a) “Agency” means  an agency that hires, trains and supervises direct support professionals using
state funds received from the Department of Human Services. ]
[(b)] (a) “Attendant care services” means  services provided directly to an individual with a
disability to assist with activities  of daily living, instrumental activities of daily living and health-
related tasks.
[(c)] (b) “Child” means an individual under 18 years of age who:
(A) Has a developmental or intellectual disability; or
(B) Meets the  eligibility criteria to receive services under the Medically Fragile (Hospital)
Model Waiver or the Medically Involved Children’s Waiver  approved by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(c).
[(d)] (c) “Client” means an individual who receives attendant care services.
[(e)] (d) “Client child” means a child who receives attendant care services from the child’s  par-
ent.
[(f)] (e) “Developmental disability services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 427.101.
[(g) “Direct support professional”  means an individual who is hired, employed, trained, paid and
supervised by an agency to provide attendant care services to a client of the agency. ]
[(h)] (f) “Nonparent caregiver” means a direct support professional, personal  support worker or
similar provider who is paid to provide attendant care services to clients who are  not the provider’s
children.
[(i)] (g) “Parent” includes a:
(A) Natural or adoptive parent of a child;
(B) Stepparent of a child; and
(C) Legal guardian of a child.
[(j)(A) ] (h)(A) “Parent provider” means a parent who is paid to provide  attendant care services
to the parent’s minor child.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 7
(B) “Parent provider” does not include a parent who is paid to  provide attendant care services
to a child who is 18 years of age or older.
[(k)(A) ] (i)(A) “Personal support  worker” means an individual who is employed by a client or
the client’s representative and paid to provide attendant care services to the client.
(B) “Personal support worker” does not include a direct support professional.
[(L)] (j) “State plan” means Oregon’s state plan for medical assistance, described in 42  U.S.C.
1396a, approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
[(m)] (k) “Very high behavioral needs” means a minor child’s extraordinary needs for support
due to the child’s behavioral condition as  indicated by a federally approved functional needs as-
sessment adopted by the department that assigns the child to the highest service level.
[(n)] (L) “Very high medical needs” means a minor child’s  extraordinary needs for support due
to the child’s medical condition  as indicated by a federally approved functional needs assessment
adopted by the department that assigns the child to the highest service level.
(2) Subject to rules adopted under subsection (8) of this section, to ORS 427.194 and  to available
funding, the department shall administer a program  to compensate parents to provide attendant care
services to the parents’ children who have been assessed by the department to have  very high
medical or very high behavioral needs.
(3) To be eligible for the program described in this section:
(a) A parent provider must be employed by an agency and not by the child or  the other parent
of the child;
(b) The parent provider  may not be paid to provide attendant care services to the client child
by an agency that is owned by the parent, the child or any family member  or for which the parent
or other family  member serves in any administrative or leadership capacity, including as a member
of a board of directors; and
(c) The agency employing the parent  provider to provide attendant care services to the client
child:
(A) May not employ a parent provider as an independent contractor;
(B) Shall pay parent providers overtime  at the same rate and under the same circumstances as
direct support professionals who are not parent providers;
(C) Except as authorized by the department by rule, may not pay providers of  attendant care
services, including parent  providers, to provide services to a minor child during school hours unless
the minor child is temporarily at home recovering from surgery or illness and the temporary absence
from school is recommended by the child’s health care provider; and
(D) May not pay providers of attendant  care services, including parent providers, to provide
services to a minor child during school hours due to the determination of  a school district or due
to the choice of a parent of the client child to:
(i) Have the child regularly attend school less than  the number of school hours attended by
students without disabilities who are in the same grade and  the same school district as the client
child;
(ii) Homeschool the client child; or
(iii) Enroll the client  child in a private school that offers fewer school hours than the school
hours offered by the local public school to the majority of students in the same grade  as the client
child.
(4) Subsection (3)(c)(D) of  this section does not prohibit a school district or other entity from
compensating  parents  of students with disabilities for providing support for educational activities
that would otherwise be the responsibility of the school district.
(5) A parent provider, during the hours that the  parent provider is paid to provide one-on-one
attendant care services to the client child:
(a) May not be responsible for a vulnerable adult who requires physical care and monitoring;
(b) May not be responsible for the care of a child, other  than the client child, who is under 10
years of  age and shall have another caregiver immediately available at all times to attend to the
needs of the child; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 8
(c) Unless they are included as a goal or service in the child’s individual support plan and  re-
lated to the child’s disability-related support needs,  may not perform tasks that are not for the pri-
mary benefit of the client child, including but not limited to:
(A) Grocery shopping for the household;
(B) Housekeeping not required for the disability-related support needs of the client child;
(C) Remote work or operation of a home business; or
(D) Transporting individuals other than the client child to or from activities or appointments.
(6) If required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the department may require
a parent provider to assign an alternative legal representative for the client child  to make decisions
about or manage  the development and implementation of the client child’s individual support plan.
The assignment:
(a) Must be on a form prescribed by the department; and
(b) Must clearly state that the assignment is limited to decisions regarding the development  and
implementation of the child’s individual support plan and does not limit the authority of  the parent
provider to make decisions for the client child with respect to health care,  education or religious
training.
(7) A parent provider is subject to the requirements of mandatory reporting of abuse under  ORS
124.060 and 419B.010, 24 hours per day, seven days per week.
(8) The department shall adopt rules for the program described in this section using  an advisory
committee appointed under ORS 183.333 that represents  the interests of parents, children with de-
velopmental or intellectual disabilities, adults with disabilities, agencies,  organizations of direct
support professionals and personal  support workers and organizations that advocate for persons
with disabilities. The rules must include all of the following:
(a) Strategies to safeguard nonparent caregivers and avoid the displacement of nonparent
caregivers by parent providers;
(b) Requirements for agencies  to demonstrate consistent efforts to recruit, train and retain
nonparent caregivers;
(c) Training requirements for:
(A) Parent providers regarding federal and state administrative rules regulating home-based and
community-based services, including the impact of the rules on  parent-child relationships with re-
spect to discipline, supervision, physical  intervention and self-determination of client children during
the hours that the parent provider is being paid to provide attendant care services;
(B) Client children to  learn to advocate for themselves with respect to choosing and managing
direct support professionals before and after reaching 18 years of age; and
(C) Community developmental disability programs related to the employment of parent providers,
including on how to  support families to manage issues concerning conflicts of interest, provider
recruitment and retention and  the empowerment of the client child to have a meaningful voice in
the selection of the client child’s direct support professionals;
(d) A process for a client child to object  to the hiring of any caregiver, including the child’s
parent, or to raise concerns about a provider’s caregiving;
(e) Procedures to ensure that the program described in this section is implemented  consistently
and equitably throughout this state;
(f) A requirement that any appeal related to the requirements of or benefits under the  program
is the sole responsibility of the central office staff of the department; and
(g) Other requirements that the department deems necessary to carry out the provisions  of this
section.
(9) The department may adopt rules necessary to manage the cost, size  and growth rate of the
program described in this section that are necessary to protect  the eligibility for and levels of ser-
vices under programs serving individuals receiving  developmental disability services provided for in
the state plan, including the development of criteria to limit the number of children eligible to par-
ticipate in the program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 9
(10) Annually, the  department shall report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to human services  or, if the Legislative Assembly is in session, to the committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to human services,  in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, updates on
the program described in this section, including:
(a) The number of client children receiving attendant care services, the  number of children re-
ceiving the services from parent providers and the number of  children receiving the services from
nonparent caregivers;
(b) The number of hours of attendant  care services provided by parent providers and number
of hours of attendant care services provided by nonparent caregivers;
(c) A comparison of the cost per child of providing attendant care services by  parent providers
under the program with the cost per child of providing attendant care services  by nonparent
caregivers; and
(d) A report on the adequacy of  the direct care workforce in this state to provide services to
all children with developmental disability services who are eligible for attendant care services.
SECTION 10. In setting agency  payment rates, the Department of Human Services shall
adopt a differentiated rate model for an agency that  employs a direct support professional
who resides with a client. The differentiated rate model adopted under this section:
(1) Shall reflect  the reduced overhead costs to the agency as a result of the direct sup-
port professional residing with the client;
(2) May not reduce the hours of service for which the client is eligible; and
(3) May not reduce the wages of the direct support professional.
PLACEMENT DECISIONS
SECTION 11.
Sections 12 and 13 of this 2026 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
418.205 to 418.327.
SECTION 12. Out-of-state placement exceptions.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS 418.321  or
418.322, if there is reason to know, as described in ORS 419B.636, that a child  is an Indian
child, the Department of Human Services may place  the child in an out-of-state institution
meeting the criteria described in ORS 419B.654 (1)(d)(B)(iv) without requiring the institution
to be licensed by or under contract with the department or to be a  qualified residential
treatment program if:
(a) The placement complies with the placement preferences under ORS 419B.654; and
(b) The  department provides at least 10 days’ notice to the court and the parties of the
proposed placement or, if the delay caused by providing this notice would likely result in
serious physical  or emotional harm to the child, endanger the child’s life or cause loss of
placement availability, the department shall provide the notice to the court and the  parties
as soon as practicable and  in no event later than one business day after the child leaves this
state.
(2) ORS 418.321 does not apply to the department’s  placement of a child in an out-of-state
child-caring agency if:
(a) The placement is for the purpose of placing the child or ward in a relative foster home
or pre-adoptive family placement that has been selected and approved by the department;
(b) The  department retains the sole authority to approve the foster care or pre-adoptive
placement of the child;
(c) The child is not placed in  a congregate care residential setting, as defined in ORS
418.322; and
(d) The placement complies with the requirements of  the Interstate Compact on the
Placement of Children.
SECTION 13.
Accompaniment of child in care in  an out-of-state placement.  (1) If the
Department of Human Services places a child in an out-of-state child-caring  agency, a de-
partment child welfare services employee must accompany the child  when the child is
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 10
transported to the initial out-of-state placement,  any time the child is moved to a new
placement and any time the child is moved by secure transport.
(2) Notwithstanding  subsection (1) of this section, if a child placed in an out-of-state
child-caring agency requires secure transport from an out-of-state  location due to an emer-
gency, a department child welfare services employee  is not required to accompany the child
if the time it would take for the  employee to travel to the child’s out-of-state location would
pose a risk to the  health, safety or welfare of the child. If a department child welfare ser-
vices employee does not accompany a child transported to an alternate out-of-state place-
ment, as provided in this subsection, the child welfare services employee  must immediately
travel to meet the child at the new out-of-state facility.
(3) As used in this section, “out-of-state child-caring agency” has the meaning given  that
term in ORS 418.321.
SECTION 14.
Access to out-of-state eating disorder program. (1) ORS 418.321 does  not
apply to the Department of Human Services’ admission of a child in an  out-of-state eating
disorder treatment program if:
(a) The child is diagnosed with an eating disorder;
(b) The child’s treating  provider is not employed by or contracted with by the depart-
ment;
(c) The child’s treating provider  determines that the child requires admission to the
out-of-state  eating disorder treatment program because the child’s needs related to the eat-
ing disorder cannot be met by an eating disorder treatment program in this state;
(d) The Oregon Health Authority has enrolled the out-of-state eating disorder treatment
program as a provider in the state medical assistance program;
(e) The out-of-state eating disorder  treatment program is regulated and in good standing
with the authority and  any entity regulating child-caring agencies in the state in which the
facility is located;
(f) The responsible  Medicaid entity has approved the services and treatment to be pro-
vided to the child;
(g) The child’s admission to the  out-of-state eating disorder treatment program is ap-
proved by the court prior to the child leaving this state or, if the time it would take for the
court to approve  the admission would threaten the child’s life, the child’s admission is ap-
proved by the court as soon as practicable after the child leaves this state; and
(h) The director of the division of the department that administers the state child welfare
program authorizes the department’s request for the child  to be considered for admission to
the out-of-state eating disorder program.
(2) When a child has  been admitted for treatment to an out-of-state eating disorder
treatment program under this section:
(a) A Department of Human Services employee must make an  in-person visit to the
program and certify the program as substantially compliant with  the licensing requirements
for child-caring agencies that  would apply if the program was providing services in this state;
(b) A department employee who is  familiar to the child shall visit the child in person at
least twice per month while the child is admitted to the program;
(c) The child’s caseworker or the caseworker’s supervisor shall have  weekly contact with
the child, either by telephone, in person or through an electronic platform; and
(d) The department shall provide necessary supports  to the child’s family or foster family
to participate in the child’s treatment, including through the purchase of transportation or
lodging, as appropriate.
(3) ORS 418.215 (2) does not apply to an out-of-state  eating disorder treatment program
into which a child is admitted under this section.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 418.321 is amended to read:
418.321. (1) Except as provided in section 12 of this 2026 Act, and  subject to  ORS 418.322,
the Department of Human Services may place a child in an out-of-state child-caring agency only if:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 11
(a) The [ out-of-state child-caring] agency is licensed to provide or engage in the provision of  care
or services by the department under ORS  418.205 to 418.327 and complies with the licensing re-
quirements under ORS 418.215;
(b) The department has a current contract with the [ child-caring] agency; and
(c) The department’s contract with  the [ child-caring] agency meets the [ criteria] requirements
under subsection (3) of this section.
(2) If an out-of-state child-caring agency is required to be licensed by the department
under this section:
(a) The department shall license [ an out-of-state child-caring ] the agency pursuant to  the same
licensure requirements the  department would impose if the [ out-of-state child-caring] agency was lo-
cated in this state.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of Article V of  the Interstate Compact on the Placement of
Children and ORS 417.230, the department  may not delegate the department’s licensing, visitation,
inspection, investigation or supervision of [ an out-of-state child-caring agency licensed by the  depart-
ment to provide care or services to an Oregon child ] the agency .
(3) If the department is required under this  section to have a contract with an out-of-
state child-caring agency:
(a) The department shall review  the [ department’s contract with an out-of-state child-caring agency
prior to placing a child with the  child-caring agency ] contract prior to placing a child with the
agency.
(b) The contract must, at a minimum, meet the following [ criteria] requirements :
(A) At the time the contract is executed, the [ child-caring] agency must provide  the department
with a current list of every entity for which the [ child-caring] agency is providing placement ser-
vices.
(B) No later than 15 days after accepting placement of a child  from a new entity, the [ child-
caring] agency must notify the department in writing of the [ child-caring] agency’s association with
the new entity. The notice must include the name and contact information of the  new entity and the
name and contact information of an individual associated with the new entity.
(C) The [ child-caring] agency must make  mandatory reports of child abuse, as defined in ORS
418.257 and 419B.005, involving Oregon children both to the centralized child abuse reporting system
described  in  ORS 418.190 and as required under the laws of the state in which the [ child-caring]
agency is located.
(D) The [ child-caring] agency must  allow the department full access to the [ child-caring] agency’s
facilities, residents, records and personnel as  necessary for the department to conduct child abuse
investigations and licensing activities or investigations.
(E) The [ child-caring] agency  must notify the department in writing no later than three business
days after any state determines that an allegation of child abuse or a license violation  involving the
[child-caring] agency is founded, regardless of whether the child  abuse or violation involves an
Oregon child.
(F) The [ child-caring] agency must notify  the department in writing no later than three business
days after the [ child-caring] agency receives notice from  any other state imposing a restriction on
placement of children with  the [ child-caring] agency, suspending or revoking the [ child-caring]
agency’s license with that state or indicating the  state’s intent to suspend or revoke the
[child-caring] agency’s license with that state.
(G) The [ child-caring] agency must notify the department immediately, verbally and in writing:
(i) Any time a child from  any state who is in the care of the [ child-caring] agency dies, is
sexually assaulted or suffers serious physical injury; or
(ii) When the [ child-caring] agency becomes aware of any criminal investigation, arrest or
criminal charges involving an agency staff member if the alleged offense involved a child  or could
have reasonably posed a risk to the health, safety or welfare of a child.
(H) Except with respect to protected information described in ORS 418.256 (5), the
[child-caring] agency may not ask or require an employee or volunteer to sign a nondisclosure  or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 12
other agreement prohibiting the employee or volunteer from the good faith disclosure  of information
concerning the abuse or mistreatment of a child who  is in the care of the [ child-caring] agency, vi-
olations of licensing or certification requirements,  criminal activity at the [ child-caring] agency, vi-
olations of state or  federal laws or any practice that threatens the health and safety of a child in
the care of the [ child-caring] agency.
(I) The [ child-caring] agency must ensure staffing ratio and staff  training and education re-
quirements that meet, at a minimum, the standards set by the department by rule  for intensive be-
havioral support services.
(J) The [ child-caring] agency must meet all of the program, discipline,  behavior support, super-
vision and child rights requirements adopted by the department by rule for  behavioral rehabilitation
services provided in this state.
(K) The [ child-caring] agency may not practice conversion therapy, as defined in ORS 675.850.
(L) The [ child-caring] agency  must identify a child by the child’s preferred name and pronouns
and may not implement  a dress code that prohibits or requires clothing on the basis of biological
sex.
(M) Genetic testing, including testing  for psychopharmacological purposes, must be approved by
a court and may not be included as a standing order for a child in care.
(N) Neither the [ child-caring] agency nor its  contractors or volunteers may use chemical or
mechanical restraints on a child, including during secure transport.
(O) The [ child-caring] agency must ensure  that the use of any psychotropic medications for a
child placed with the [ child-caring] agency by the department is  in compliance with ORS 418.517 and
any rules regarding psychotropic medications adopted by the department.
(4) The department shall develop rules outlining  a process for review of the out-of-state place-
ment of a child who is identified as a child with  an intellectual or developmental disability or who
is suspected of having an intellectual or developmental disability. At a minimum, the rules must:
(a) Identify a process for expediting review of the child’s eligibility for developmental disability
services.
(b) Require that a multidisciplinary [ review] team, including administrators in the  developmental
disability services program, review the placement before the child is placed out-of-state.
(c) Require that  a multidisciplinary team, including administrators in the developmental disa-
bility services program, monitor the progress of the child in the out-of-state placement.
(d) Require that contracts for placement of  the child ensure that the child has the same rights
and protections that the child would have if the child was placed in this state.
[(5)(a) A department child welfare services employee must  accompany a child who is placed in an
out-of-state child-caring agency any time the child is  transported to an initial out-of-state placement, any
time the child is moved to a new placement and any time the child is moved by secure transport. ]
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  if a child placed in an out-of-state child-
caring agency  requires secure transport from the out-of-state placement due to an emergency, a depart-
ment child welfare services employee is not required to accompany the child if the time it would  take
for the employee to travel to the child’s out-of-state location would pose a risk to  the health, safety or
welfare of the child. If a department child welfare services  employee does not accompany a child
transported to an alternate out-of-state placement, as provided in  this paragraph, the child welfare
services employee must immediately travel to meet the child at the new out-of-state facility. ]
[(6)(a)] (5)(a)  As used in this subsection, “juvenile offender” means a person under 18 years  of
age who has or is alleged  to have committed an act that is a violation, or, if done by an adult, would
constitute a violation, of a law or ordinance of the United States or a county or city in this state.
(b) Except  as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, the department may not place a child
in an out-of-state child-caring  agency if the [ child-caring] agency provides care to juvenile offenders.
(c) The department may place a  child in an out-of-state child-caring agency that provides care
to juvenile offenders only if:
(A) The [ child-caring] agency is a qualified residential treatment program licensed by  the de-
partment;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 13
(B) The [ child-caring] agency maintains site-specific accreditation from  a nationally recognized
organization;
(C) The child being placed is a juvenile offender; and
(D) Prior to the hearing to approve the  placement, the court and all parties to the dependency
case have been informed of the nature of the services offered by the program  and of the population
served by the program, and the  court, having considered the nature of the services and composition
of the facility population and the report of the qualified individual, has found  that placement in the
facility is the least restrictive setting available to appropriately meet the child’s treatment needs.
(6) As used  in this section, “out-of-state child-caring agency” means a provider of
children’s care or services  in a state other than Oregon that would be required to be li-
censed, certified or otherwise authorized by the department under ORS 418.240 if the pro-
vider provided the care or services in this state.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 418.205 is amended to read:
418.205. As used in ORS  418.205 to 418.327, 418.330, 418.470, 418.475, 418.950 to 418.970 and
418.992 to 418.998, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Child” means an unmarried person under 21  years of age who resides in or receives care
or services from a child-caring agency.
(2)(a) “Child-caring agency” means:
(A) Any private school, private agency, private organization or county program providing:
(i) Day treatment for children with emotional disturbances;
(ii) Adoption placement services;
(iii) Residential care, including but not limited to  foster care or residential treatment for chil-
dren;
(iv) Residential care in combination with academic education  and therapeutic care, including
but not limited to treatment for emotional, behavioral or mental health disturbances;
(v) Outdoor youth programs; or
(vi) Other similar care or services for children.
(B) Any private organization  or person that provides secure transportation services as defined
in ORS 418.241 during any segment of a child’s trip to or from a child-caring agency,  certified foster
home as defined in  ORS 418.241 or developmental disabilities residential facility as defined in ORS
418.241, if the route of the child’s trip begins or ends in this state.
(b) “Child-caring agency” includes the following:
(A) A shelter-care home that is not a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(B) An independent residence facility as described in ORS 418.475  that meets the standards es-
tablished by the Department of Human Services by rule to be considered a child-caring agency;
(C) A private residential boarding school;
(D) A child-caring facility as defined in ORS 418.950; and
(E) A secure nonemergency medical transportation provider, as defined in ORS 418.241.
(c) “Child-caring agency” does not include:
(A) Residential facilities or  foster care homes certified or licensed by the Department of Human
Services under ORS 443.400 to 443.455, 443.830 and 443.835 for children receiving developmental
disability services;
(B) Any private  agency or organization facilitating the provision of respite services for parents
pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056. For purposes of  this sub-
paragraph, “respite services”  means the voluntary assumption of short-term care and control of a
minor child without compensation or reimbursement of expenses for the purpose of providing a
parent in crisis with relief from the demands of ongoing care of the parent’s child;
(C) A youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415;
(D) A shelter-care home that is a foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(E) A foster home subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645;
(F) A facility that exclusively serves individuals 18 years of age and older; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 14
(G) A facility that primarily serves both adults and children but requires that any child must
be accompanied at all times by at least one custodial parent or guardian.
(3) “Child-caring facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.950.
(4)(a) “County program” means any county operated program that provides care or services  to
children:
(A) In the custody of the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Youth Authority; or
(B) Under a contract with the Oregon Health Authority.
(b) “County program” does not include any local juvenile detention facility  that receives state
services provided and coordinated by the Department of Corrections under ORS 169.070.
(5) “Governmental agency” means an executive, legislative  or judicial agency, department,
board, commission, authority, institution or instrumentality of this state or of a  county, municipality
or other political subdivision of this state.
(6) “Independent residence facility” means a facility as described in ORS 418.475.
(7)(a) “Outdoor youth program” means a program that provides, in an  outdoor living setting,
services  to  children who have behavioral problems, mental health problems or problems with abuse
of alcohol or drugs.
(b) “Outdoor youth program” does not include any program, facility or activity:
(A) Operated by a governmental entity;
(B) Operated or affiliated with the Oregon Youth Corps;
(C) Licensed by the Department of Human Services under  other authority of the department; or
(D) Operated by a youth job development organization as defined in ORS 344.415.
(8) “Out-of-state child-caring agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.321.
[(8)] (9)  “Private” means not owned,  operated or administered by any governmental agency or
unit.
[(9)] (10) “Private residential boarding school” means either of the  following as the context re-
quires:
(a) A child-caring agency that is a private school  that provides residential care in combination
with academic education and therapeutic care,  including but not limited to treatment for emotional,
behavioral or mental health disturbances; or
(b) A private school providing residential care that is primarily engaged  in educational work
under ORS 418.327.
[(10)] (11) “Proctor foster home” means a foster home certified by a child-caring agency  under
ORS 418.248 that is not subject to ORS 418.625 to 418.645.
[(11)] (12) “Provider of care  or services for children” means a person, entity or organization that
provides care or services to children, regardless of whether the child is  in the custody of the De-
partment of Human Services,  and that does not otherwise meet the definition of, or requirements for,
a child-caring agency. “Provider of care or services for children” includes a proctor foster  home
certified by a child-caring agency under ORS 418.248.
[(12)] (13) “Qualified residential treatment program” means a program described  in ORS 418.323.
[(13)] (14) “Shelter-care home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.470.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 419B.351 is amended to read:
419B.351. (1) The Department of Human Services shall move the court for approval of a place-
ment no later than 30 days following the date the department placed, or will place,  a child or ward
in a qualified residential treatment program described in ORS 418.323.
(2)(a) The motion for approval of the placement must include, at a minimum:
(A) The date of the placement;
(B) To the extent practicable, the parties’ placement preferences; and
(C) A copy of the child’s or ward’s independent assessment described in ORS 418.324.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(C)  of this subsection, if the independent assessment is not
completed at the time the department files  the motion under subsection (1) of this section, the de-
partment may file the motion under this section without the assessment and shall supplement  the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 15
motion with a copy  of the completed assessment immediately following the department’s receipt of
the completed assessment.
(3) The department shall provide  an exact copy of the motion to each of the parties listed in
ORS 419B.875.
(4) Upon receipt of a motion under this section, the court shall schedule a  hearing to occur no
later than 60 days following the date the child or ward is placed in the qualified residential treat-
ment program.
(5)(a) The court shall enter an order approving or disapproving the placement and  make specific
determinations regarding the following:
(A) Whether the needs of the child or ward can be  met through placement in a foster family
home or in a proctor foster home as defined in ORS 418.205.
(B) If the court determines that the needs of the  child or ward cannot be met through placement
in a foster family home or proctor  foster home, whether placement of the child or ward in the
qualified residential treatment program:
(i) Provides  the least restrictive setting to provide the most effective and appropriate level of
care for the child or ward; and
(ii) Is consistent with the child’s or ward’s case plan.
(b) In addition to the determinations under paragraph (a) of this subsection, if  the motion is for
approval of the placement of a child or ward in  an out-of-state child-caring agency that serves ju-
venile offenders , [ as defined in ORS 418.321 (6) ] as those terms are defined in  ORS 418.321 , the
court may not approve the placement unless  the court finds that the child or ward’s placement in
the out-of-state child-caring agency is  the least restrictive setting available to meet the child or
ward’s treatment needs, taking into consideration all of the following:
(A) The nature of the services offered by the child-caring agency;
(B) The population served by the child-caring agency;
(C) The percentage of the child-caring agency’s population that is juvenile offenders; and
(D) Whether  the child-caring agency is required to file a report under the Prison Rape Elimi-
nation Act of 2003, 34 U.S.C. 30301 et seq.
(c) The court may receive testimony, reports or other material relating to the  child’s or ward’s
mental, physical and social history and prognosis without regard  to the competency or relevancy
of the testimony, reports or other material under the rules of evidence.
(6) The court shall enter an order under subsection (5) of this section no later than 60 days
following the date the child or ward is placed in the qualified residential treatment program.
(7) If the court enters an order disapproving the child’s or ward’s  placement, the department
shall move the child or ward to a placement that provides  care, supervision and services that are
consistent with the court’s order no later  than 30 days following the date the court enters the order.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 418.322 is amended to read:
418.322. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Congregate care residential setting” means any setting that cares  for more than one child
or ward and is not a setting described in ORS 418.205 (2)(c)(A), (D), (E) or (F) or [ (10)] (11).
(b) “Sex trafficking” means  the recruitment, harboring, transportation, provision, obtaining, pa-
tronizing or soliciting of a person under 18 years of age for the  purpose of a commercial sex act,
as defined in ORS 163.266, or the  recruitment, harboring, transportation, provision or obtaining of
a person over 18 years of age using force, fraud or coercion for the purpose of a commercial  sex
act, as defined in ORS 163.266.
(2) The Department of Human Services may  place a child or ward in a congregate care resi-
dential setting only if the setting is:
(a) A child-caring agency, as defined  in ORS 418.205, a hospital, as defined in ORS 442.015, or
a rural hospital, as defined in ORS 442.470; and
(b) A qualified residential treatment program described in ORS 418.323.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, the department may place a child  or ward in
a child-caring agency that is not a qualified residential treatment program if:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 16
(a) The child-caring agency is providing prenatal, postpartum  or parenting supports to the child
or ward.
(b) The  child or ward is placed in an independent residence facility described in ORS 418.475
that is licensed by the department as a child-caring agency.
(c) The child or ward is, or is at risk of becoming, a victim of sex trafficking and the child-caring
agency is providing high-quality residential care and supportive services to the child or ward.
(d) The Oregon Health Authority has approved the placement as medically  necessary and the
child-caring agency:
(A) Is a residential care facility;
(B) Is licensed by  the authority and maintains site-specific accreditation from a nationally re-
cognized organization to provide psychiatric treatment to children; and
(C) Has an active provider agreement with the Oregon Medicaid program.
(e) The child-caring agency is an adolescent  residential drug and alcohol treatment program li-
censed or certified by the State of Oregon to  provide residential care, and the court has approved,
or approval is pending for, the placement in  the child-caring agency of each child or ward over
whom the department retains jurisdiction.
(f) The placement with the child-caring  agency is for the purpose of placing the child or ward
in a proctor foster home.
(g) The child-caring agency is a  residential care facility licensed by the department that pro-
vides short-term assessment and stabilization services.
(h) The child-caring agency is a shelter-care home, as defined in ORS 418.470, that provides
short-term assessment and stabilization services.
(i) The child-caring agency is a homeless, runaway or transitional living shelter  licensed by the
department that provides short-term assessment and stabilization services.
(j) The ward is 18 years of age or older and the child-caring agency is a residential  treatment
facility or a residential home licensed or certified by the department or the Oregon Health Au-
thority.
(4) The department may not place a child or ward in a residential care facility or  shelter-care
home described in subsection (3)(g) or (h) of this section:
(a) For more than 60 consecutive days or 90 cumulative days in a 12-month period; or
(b) If the residential care facility or shelter-care home also serves  youths or adjudicated youths
served by  the county juvenile department or adjudicated youths committed to the custody of the
Oregon Youth Authority by the court.
(5) The department may not place a child or ward  in a homeless, runaway or transitional living
shelter described in subsection (3)(i) of this section for more than 60 consecutive or 90 cumulative
days in any 12-month period.
(6) Calculations of the number of days a child  or ward is placed in a shelter-care home under
subsection (3)(h) of  this section or a homeless, runaway or transitional living shelter under sub-
section (3)(i) of this section exclude the days the child or ward  is in the shelter-care home or shelter
if the child or ward:
(a) Accessed the shelter-care home or shelter without the support or direction of the depart-
ment; and
(b) Is homeless or a runaway, as defined by the department by rule.
(7)(a) Nothing in this  section prohibits the Oregon Youth Authority from placing an adjudicated
youth committed to  its custody in a placement that is not a qualified residential treatment program.
(b) Nothing in this section  prohibits the Oregon Youth Authority or a county juvenile depart-
ment from placing an adjudicated youth or a youth served by the  Oregon Youth Authority or the
county juvenile department in shelter care or detention under ORS chapter 419C.
RESTRAINT AND SECLUSION OF CHILDREN IN CARE
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 17
SECTION 19. Substantiation exception for lapsed certification.  (1) The  Department of
Human Services may not substantiate an  allegation of abuse against an individual under ORS
418.259 arising out of the individual’s restraint of a child in care in violation  of ORS 418.521
or 418.523 for the sole reason that the individual’s certification issued under  ORS 418.529 is
not current.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Child in care” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.257.
(b) “Restraint” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.519.
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 20.
Captions. The unit and section captions used in this  2026 Act are provided
only for the convenience of the reader and do not become part of  the statutory law of this
state or express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 21. Effective date.  This  2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preserva-
tion of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026
Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 19, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 2, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 18